nb: Telefonledningstype: Kveilet; Flatt bånd; Uttrekkbar; Spiralskjermet; Rett; Annet
zh-CN: 电话线样式: 螺旋卷曲型; 扁平带状; 可伸缩线; 螺旋屏蔽型; 直线型; 其他
da: Telefonledningsstil: Oprullet; Fladt bånd; Udtrækkelig; Med spiralskærm; Lige; Andet
sv: Telefonsladdens stil: Ringad; Platt band; Hopfällbart; Spiralskärmad; Rakt; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบสายโทรศัพท์: ขด; ริบบิ้นแบน; แบบพับเก็บได้; ป้องกันเกลียว; ผมตรง; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu dây điện thoại: Xoắn lò xo; Ruy băng dẹt; Có thể cuộn gọn; Chống xoắn; Thẳng; Khác
fi: Puhelimen johtotyyppi: Kierretty; Litteä nauha; Sisäänvedettävä; Kierresuojattu; Suora; Muu
el: Στυλ τηλεφωνικού καλωδίου: Σπειροειδές; Πλατύ καλώδιο; Πτυσσόμενο; Με σπειροειδή θωράκιση; Ευθύ; Άλλο
nl: Telefoonsnoer stijl: Opgerold; Platte liijn; Uitschuifbaar; Spiraal-afgeschermd; Steil; Andere
es: Estilo de cable telefónico: En espiral; Cinta plana; Retráctil; Blindado en espiral; Liso; Otros
en: Telephone cord style: Coiled; Flat ribbon; Retractable; Spiral-shielded; Straight; Other
bg-BG: Стил на телефонен кабел: Навит; Плоска панделка; Прибиращ се; Със спирален протектор; Прав; Други
it: Stile del cavo telefonico: A spirale; Nastro piatto; Retrattile; schermato a spirale; Dritto; Altro
hu: Telefonzsinór stílusa: Tekercselt; Lapos szalag; Visszahúzható; Spirálisan árnyékolt; Egyenes; Egyéb
hr-HR: Stil telefonskog kabela: Spiralno; Ravna vrpca; Na uvlačenje; Spiralno zaštićeno; Ravna; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo de cabo telefônico: Enrolado; Fitas planas; Retrátil; Blindado em espiral; Liso; Outro
tr: Telefon kablosu stili: Sarılmış; Yassı şerit; Geri çekilebilir; Spiral korumalı; Düz; Diğer
de: Telefonkabelstil: Gewickelt; Flachband; Einziehbar; Spiral-geschirmt; Gerade; Sonstiges
fr: Style de cordon de téléphone: Enroulé; Ruban plat; Rétractable; Blindage en spirale; Lisses; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de cabo telefónico: Enrolado; Fita lisa; Retrátil; Proteção em espiral; Liso; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de cablu telefonic: Înfășurat; Panglică plată; Retractabil; Ecranat în spirală; Dreaptă; Altele
pl: Styl przewodu telefonicznego: Zwijany; Płaska wstęga; Rozwijany; Teleskopowy spiralny; Prosty; Inne
sk-SK: Štýl telefónneho kábla: Špirálový; Plochý pásikový kábel; Sklopný; Špirálovo tienený; Rovný; Iné
ru: Тип телефонного кабеля: Спиральный; Плоский ленточный; Втягивающийся; Спиральный экранированный; Прямой; Другой
ja: 電話コードスタイル: コイル状; フラットリボン; 格納式; スパイラル; ストレート; その他
zh-TW: 電話線樣式: 盤繞; 扁平緞帶; 可伸縮; 螺旋式屏蔽; 直式; 其他
lt-LT: Telefono laido stilius: Susuktas; Plokščias kaspinas; Ištraukiamas; Spiralinis, ekranuotas; Tiesus; Kita
ko: 전화선 스타일: 코일; 플랫 리본; 개폐식; 나선형 차폐형; 일자형; 기타
cs: Typ telefonního kabelu: Spirálový; Plochý; Zatahovací; Se spirálovým stíněním; Rovný; Jiné
sl-SI: Slog telefonskega kabla: Spiralni; Ravni trak; Izvlečno; Spiralno oklopljen; Ravni; Drugo